hu_hu.affix
SFX A a áitokéiba a
SFX A a áitokéi a
SFX A a áitokéhoz a
SFX A a áitokéból a
SFX A a áitokéban a
SFX A a áitokéba a
SFX A a áitoké a
SFX A a áitokul a
SFX A a áitoktól a
SFX A a áitokról a
SFX A a áitokra a
SFX A a áitokon a
SFX A a áitoknál a
SFX A a áitoknak a
SFX A a áitokként a
SFX A a áitokká a
SFX A a áitokkor a
SFX A a áitokkal a
SFX A a áitokig a
SFX A a áitokhoz a
SFX A a áitokból a
SFX A a áitokban a
SFX A a áitokba a
SFX A a áitokat a
SFX A a áitok a
SFX A a áit a
SFX A a áiról a
SFX A a áira a
SFX A a áinál a
SFX A a áinkéért a
SFX A a áinkévá a
SFX A a áinkéval a
SFX A a áinkéul a
SFX A a áinkétól a
SFX A a áinkét a
SFX A a áinkéról a
SFX A a áinkért a
SFX A a áinkéra a
SFX A a áinkénál a
SFX A a áinkénak a
SFX A a áinkén a
SFX A a áinkéiért a
SFX A a áinkéivá a
SFX A a áinkéival a
SFX A a áinkéiul a
SFX A a áinkéitól a
SFX A a áinkéit a
SFX A a áinkéiról a
SFX A a áinkéira a
SFX A a áinkéinál a
SFX A a áinkéinak a
SFX A a áinkéin a
SFX A a áinkéiig a
SFX A a áinkéihoz a
SFX A a áinkéig a
SFX A a áinkéiból a
SFX A a áinkéiban a
SFX A a áinkéiba a
SFX A a áinkéi a
SFX A a áinkéhoz a
SFX A a áinkéból a
SFX A a áinkéban a
SFX A a áinkéba a
SFX A a áinké a
SFX A a áinkul a
SFX A a áinktól a
SFX A a áinkról a
SFX A a áinkra a
SFX A a áinkon a
SFX A a áinknál a
SFX A a áinknak a
SFX A a áinkként a
SFX A a áinkká a
SFX A a áinkkor a
SFX A a áinkkal a
SFX A a áinkig a
SFX A a áinkhoz a
SFX A a áinkból a
SFX A a áinkban a
SFX A a áinkba a
SFX A a áinkat a
SFX A a áink a
SFX A a áinak a
SFX A a áin a
SFX A a áiméért a
SFX A a áimévá a
SFX A a áiméval a
SFX A a áiméul a
SFX A a áimétól a
SFX A a áimét a
SFX A a áiméról a
SFX A a áimért a
SFX A a áiméra a
SFX A a áiménál a
SFX A a áiménak a
SFX A a áimén a
SFX A a áiméiért a
SFX A a áiméivá a
SFX A a áiméival a
SFX A a áiméiul a
SFX A a áiméitól a
SFX A a áiméit a
SFX A a áiméiról a
SFX A a áiméira a
SFX A a áiméinál a
SFX A a áiméinak a
SFX A a áiméin a
SFX A a áiméiig a
SFX A a áiméihoz a
SFX A a áiméig a
SFX A a áiméiból a
SFX A a áiméiban a
SFX A a áiméiba a
SFX A a áiméi a
SFX A a áiméhoz a
SFX A a áiméból a
SFX A a áiméban a
SFX A a áiméba a
SFX A a áimé a
SFX A a áimul a
SFX A a áimtól a
SFX A a áimról a
SFX A a áimra a
SFX A a áimon a
SFX A a áimnál a
SFX A a áimnak a
SFX A a áimmá a
SFX A a áimmal a
SFX A a áimként a
SFX A a áimkor a
SFX A a áimig a
SFX A a áimhoz a
SFX A a áimból a
SFX A a áimban a
SFX A a áimba a
SFX A a áimat a
SFX A a áim a
SFX A a áikéért a
SFX A a áikévá a
SFX A a áikéval a
SFX A a áikéul a
SFX A a áikétól a
SFX A a áikét a
SFX A a áikéról a
SFX A a áikért a
SFX A a áikéra a
SFX A a áikénál a
SFX A a áiként a
SFX A a áikénak a
SFX A a áikén a
SFX A a áikéiért a
SFX A a áikéivá a
SFX A a áikéival a
SFX A a áikéiul a
SFX A a áikéitól a
SFX A a áikéit a
SFX A a áikéiról a
SFX A a áikéira a
SFX A a áikéinál a
SFX A a áikéinak a
SFX A a áikéin a
SFX A a áikéiig a
SFX A a áikéihoz a
SFX A a áikéig a
SFX A a áikéiból a
SFX A a áikéiban a
SFX A a áikéiba a
SFX A a áikéi a
SFX A a áikéhoz a
SFX A a áikéból a
SFX A a áikéban a
SFX A a áikéba a
SFX A a áiké a
SFX A a áikul a
SFX A a áiktól a
SFX A a áikról a
SFX A a áikra a
SFX A a áikor a
SFX A a áikon a
SFX A a áiknál a
SFX A a áiknak a
SFX A a áikként a
SFX A a áikká a
SFX A a áikkor a
SFX A a áikkal a
SFX A a áikig a
SFX A a áikhoz a
SFX A a áikból a
SFX A a áikban a
SFX A a áikba a
SFX A a áikat a
SFX A a áik a
SFX A a áiig a
SFX A a áihoz a
SFX A a áidéért a
SFX A a áidévá a
SFX A a áidéval a
SFX A a áidéul a
SFX A a áidétól a
SFX A a áidét a
SFX A a áidéról a
SFX A a áidért a
SFX A a áidéra a
SFX A a áidénál a
SFX A a áidénak a
SFX A a áidén a
SFX A a áidéiért a
SFX A a áidéivá a
SFX A a áidéival a
SFX A a áidéiul a
SFX A a áidéitól a
SFX A a áidéit a
SFX A a áidéiról a
SFX A a áidéira a
SFX A a áidéinál a
SFX A a áidéinak a
SFX A a áidéin a
SFX A a áidéiig a
SFX A a áidéihoz a
SFX A a áidéig a
SFX A a áidéiból a
SFX A a áidéiban a
SFX A a áidéiba a
SFX A a áidéi a
SFX A a áidéhoz a
SFX A a áidéból a
SFX A a áidéban a
SFX A a áidéba a
SFX A a áidé a
SFX A a áidul a
SFX A a áidtól a
SFX A a áidról a
SFX A a áidra a
SFX A a áidon a
SFX A a áidnál a
SFX A a áidnak a
SFX A a áidként a
SFX A a áidkor a
SFX A a áidig a
SFX A a áidhoz a
SFX A a áiddá a
SFX A a áiddal a
SFX A a áidból a
SFX A a áidban a
SFX A a áidba a
SFX A a áidat a
SFX A a áid a
SFX A a áiból a
SFX A a áiban a
SFX A a áiba a
SFX A a ái a
SFX A a ádéért a
SFX A a ádévá a
SFX A a ádéval a
SFX A a ádéul a
SFX A a ádétól a
SFX A a ádét a
SFX A a ádéról a
SFX A a ádért a
SFX A a ádéra a
SFX A a ádénál a
SFX A a ádénak a
SFX A a ádén a
SFX A a ádékéért a
SFX A a ádékévá a
SFX A a ádékéval a
SFX A a ádékéul a
SFX A a ádékétól a
SFX A a ádékét a
SFX A a ádékéról a
SFX A a ádékért a
SFX A a ádékéra a
SFX A a ádékénál a
SFX A a ádékénak a
SFX A a ádékén a
SFX A a ádékéiért a
SFX A a ádékéivá a
SFX A a ádékéival a
SFX A a ádékéiul a
SFX A a ádékéitól a
SFX A a ádékéit a
SFX A a ádékéiról a
SFX A a ádékéira a
SFX A a ádékéinál a
SFX A a ádékéinak a
SFX A a ádékéin a
SFX A a ádékéiig a
SFX A a ádékéihoz a
SFX A a ádékéig a
SFX A a ádékéiból a
SFX A a ádékéiban a
SFX A a ádékéiba a
SFX A a ádékéi a
SFX A a ádékéhoz a
SFX A a ádékéból a
SFX A a ádékéban a
SFX A a ádékéba a
SFX A a ádéké a
SFX A a ádékul a
SFX A a ádéktól a
SFX A a ádékról a
SFX A a ádékra a
SFX A a ádékon a
SFX A a ádéknál a
SFX A a ádéknak a
SFX A a ádékká a
SFX A a ádékkal a
SFX A a ádékig a
SFX A a ádékhoz a
SFX A a ádékból a
SFX A a ádékban a
SFX A a ádékba a
SFX A a ádékat a
SFX A a ádék a
SFX A a ádéiért a
SFX A a ádéivá a
SFX A a ádéival a
SFX A a ádéiul a
SFX A a ádéitól a
SFX A a ádéit a
SFX A a ádéiról a
SFX A a ádéira a
SFX A a ádéinál a
SFX A a ádéinak a
SFX A a ádéin a
SFX A a ádéiig a
SFX A a ádéihoz a
SFX A a ádéig a
SFX A a ádéiból a
SFX A a ádéiban a
SFX A a ádéiba a
SFX A a ádéi a
SFX A a ádéhoz a
SFX A a ádéból a
SFX A a ádéban a
SFX A a ádéba a
SFX A a ádé a
SFX A a ádul a
SFX A a ádtól a
SFX A a ádról a
SFX A a ádra a
SFX A a ádon a
SFX A a ádnál a
SFX A a ádnak a
SFX A a ádként a
SFX A a ádkor a
SFX A a ádig a
SFX A a ádhoz a
SFX A a áddá a
SFX A a áddal a
SFX A a ádból a
SFX A a ádban a
SFX A a ádba a
SFX A a ádat a
SFX A a ád/& a
SFX A a ád a
SFX A 0 éért oo
SFX A 0 éért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 évá oo
SFX A 0 évá [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 éval oo
SFX A 0 éval [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 éul oo
SFX A 0 éul [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 étól oo
SFX A 0 étól [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ét oo
SFX A 0 ét [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 éról oo
SFX A 0 éról [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 éra oo
SFX A 0 éra [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 énál oo
SFX A 0 énál [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 énak oo
SFX A 0 énak [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 én oo
SFX A 0 én [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéért oo
SFX A 0 ékéért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékévá oo
SFX A 0 ékévá [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéval oo
SFX A 0 ékéval [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéul oo
SFX A 0 ékéul [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékétól oo
SFX A 0 ékétól [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékét oo
SFX A 0 ékét [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéról oo
SFX A 0 ékéról [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékért oo
SFX A 0 ékért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéra oo
SFX A 0 ékéra [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékénál oo
SFX A 0 ékénál [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékénak oo
SFX A 0 ékénak [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékén oo
SFX A 0 ékén [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéiért oo
SFX A 0 ékéiért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéivá oo
SFX A 0 ékéivá [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéival oo
SFX A 0 ékéival [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéiul oo
SFX A 0 ékéiul [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéitól oo
SFX A 0 ékéitól [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéit oo
SFX A 0 ékéit [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéiról oo
SFX A 0 ékéiról [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéira oo
SFX A 0 ékéira [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéinál oo
SFX A 0 ékéinál [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéinak oo
SFX A 0 ékéinak [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéin oo
SFX A 0 ékéin [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéiig oo
SFX A 0 ékéiig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéihoz oo
SFX A 0 ékéihoz [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéig oo
SFX A 0 ékéig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX A 0 ékéiból oo
SFX A 0 ékéiból [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
