hu_hu.dict
ötvenöttrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
önszuggeszció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
ó-/AUQĎŃŐi)
átvágó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
állólámpa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
Ó-Kasztília/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqß,ˇ
záróvizsga/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
zongorista/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
vízipipa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
vályú/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
viskó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
vetésforgó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
valamekkora/ŇŐĎAUKQ
uralkodó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
törökrózsa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
táró/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
tudatalatti/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
trampli/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
tojó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
tipográfia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
teniszlabda/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
tavirózsa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
talpgerenda/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
sítalpazó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
szívkamra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
számító/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
sztereotípia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
szivárgó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX)
szijácsfa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
szemantika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
szalonna/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
sugárzó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX
spektrofotometria/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
sikkadt/XADFU)
sajnálatraméltó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
rugó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
rizottó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
reprográfia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
referáda/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
radiológia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
párologó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX
pukkantó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
propedeutika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
pozdorja/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
polimorfia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
pityóka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
peseta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
pattantyú/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
paradigma/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
pacsni/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
ordó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
okostóni/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
nyárutó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
nyolcvanadik/!AUÖmŇŮKkbh)
normálosztó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
negyvenkettőmillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbcj	
nagyvakáció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
móka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
muskéta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
morfinista/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
minuta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
metélőhagyma/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
meggondolkodtató/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
manufaktúra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
magánmunka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
lópatkoló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
lyukasóra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
likacsosgomba/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
legenda/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
kürtszó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcťÖ	
kórokozó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
kékharisnya/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
kutatómunka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
krónika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
korona/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
konszonancia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
koaguláció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
kilencvenkilenctrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
kaszárnyaszoba/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
kaki/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť=
ivókupa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
indológia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
hétszázas/AFUÚ)
hulahoppkarika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
hidegindító/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
hatvanas/AUÖmŇDFSsabh
halászkampó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
gyümölcsfa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
gomolygó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX)
fürdőruha/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
futó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
fogadt/XADFU)
felszállópálya/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
ezerhatszázad/AUÚ)
emulzió/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
egyenruha/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
doktorka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
deviancia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
cukorszóró/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
csetepaté/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
charta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
buzi/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť=
bodzabogyó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
barátka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
atmoszféra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
antifóna/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
alimentáció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
adjacencia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
ék alakú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
vesztenivaló/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
teltkarcsú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
szilva alakú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
roma/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
pajzs alakú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
nagyivó/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
magunkfajta/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	
kávébarna/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
játszi/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
hiú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
gondolkodtató/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
feleakkora/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
drámai/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
bosszúálló/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
alattvalói/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
Zambia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Vay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇ
Turku/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Tarnaméra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Szolokma/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Szajla/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Schittkó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Romonya/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Pusztaapáti/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Pandula/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Nándika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Méray/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇk
Miklóssy/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇk
Majsa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Lippa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Kupa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Kisvárda/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Kajászó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Izsó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Hodinka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Gyulay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqßQ,ˇk
Fönícia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Elvira/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Dapsy/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇ
Constantia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Bucsu/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Biró/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Balsay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇk
Anna/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
A-s/ŇŮmAFUKQ)
